Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Taking Custody of Property by Administrator

393A.310.
Definition of good faith.

In KRS

393A.310

to

393A.390

, payment or delivery of property shall be made in good faith if a holder:

Had a reasonable basis for believing, based on the facts then known, that the property was required or permitted to be paid or delivered to the administrator under this chapter; or

Made payment or delivery:

In response to a demand by the administrator or administrator’s agent; or

Under a guidance or ruling issued by the administrator which the holder reasonably believed required or permitted the property to be paid or delivered.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 31, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.320.
Dormancy charge.

A holder may deduct a dormancy charge from property required to be paid or delivered to the administrator if:

A valid contract between the holder and the apparent owner authorizes imposition of the charge for the apparent owner’s failure to claim the property within a specified time; and

The holder regularly imposes the charge and regularly does not reverse or otherwise cancel the charge.

The amount of the deduction under subsection (1) of this section shall be limited to an amount that shall not be unconscionable considering all relevant factors, including the marginal transactional costs incurred by the holder in maintaining the apparent owner’s property and any services received by the apparent owner.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 32, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.330.
Payment or delivery of property to administrator.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, on filing a report under KRS

393A.220

, the holder shall pay or deliver to the administrator the property described in the report.

If property in a report under KRS

393A.220

is an automatically renewable deposit and a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result from paying the deposit to the administrator at the time of the report, the date for payment of the property to the administrator is extended until a penalty or forfeiture no longer would result from payment, if the holder informs the administrator of the extended date.

Tangible property in a safe-deposit box shall not be delivered to the administrator until one hundred twenty (120) days after filing the report under KRS

393A.220

.

If property reported to the administrator under KRS

393A.220

is a security, the administrator may:

Make an endorsement, instruction, or entitlement order on behalf of the apparent owner to invoke the duty of the issuer, its transfer agent, or the securities intermediary to transfer the security; or

Dispose of the security under KRS

393A.410

.

If the holder of property reported to the administrator under KRS

393A.220

is the issuer of a certificated security, the administrator may obtain a replacement certificate in physical or book-entry form under KRS

355.8-405

. An indemnity bond shall not be required.

The administrator shall establish procedures for the registration, issuance, method of delivery, transfer, and maintenance of securities delivered to the administrator by a holder.

An issuer, holder, and transfer agent or other person acting under this section under instructions of and on behalf of the issuer or holder shall not be liable to the apparent owner for, and shall be indemnified by the state against, a claim arising with respect to property after the property has been delivered to the administrator.

A holder shall not be required to deliver to the administrator a security identified by the holder as a non-freely transferable security. If the administrator or holder determines that a security is no longer a non-freely transferable security, the holder shall deliver the security on the next regular date prescribed for delivery of securities under this chapter. The holder shall make a determination annually whether a security identified in a report filed under KRS

393A.220

as a non-freely transferable security is no longer a non-freely transferable security.

If property reported to the administrator is virtual currency, the holder shall liquidate the virtual currency and remit the proceeds to the administrator.

The liquidation shall occur anytime within ninety (90) days prior to the filing of the report under KRS

393A.220

.

The owner shall not have recourse against the holder or the administrator to recover any gain in value that occurs after the liquidation of the virtual currency under this subsection.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 33, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 125, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

393A.340.
Effect of payment or delivery of property to administrator.

On payment or delivery of property to the administrator under this chapter, the administrator as agent for the state assumes custody and responsibility for safekeeping the property. A holder that pays or delivers property to the administrator in good faith and substantially complies with KRS

393A.270

and

393A.280

shall be relieved of liability arising thereafter with respect to payment or delivery of the property to the administrator.

This state shall defend and indemnify a holder against liability on a claim against the holder resulting from the payment or delivery of property to the administrator made in good faith and after the holder substantially complied with KRS

393A.270

and

393A.280

.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 34, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.350.
Recovery of property by holder from administrator.

A holder that pays money to the administrator under this chapter may file a claim for reimbursement from the administrator of the amount paid if the holder:

Paid the money in error; or

After paying the money to the administrator, paid money to a person the holder reasonably believed to be entitled to the money.

If a claim for reimbursement under subsection (1) of this section is made for a payment made on a negotiable instrument, including a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument, the holder shall submit proof that the instrument was presented and payment was made to a person the holder reasonably believed entitled to payment. The holder may claim reimbursement even if the payment was made to a person whose claim was made after expiration of a period of limitation on the owner’s right to receive or recover property, whether specified by contract, statute, or court order.

A holder that delivers property other than money to the administrator under this chapter may file a claim under KRS

393A.510

for return of the property from the administrator if:

The holder delivered the property in error; or

The apparent owner has claimed the property from the holder.

If a claim for return of property under subsection (3) of this section is made, the holder shall include with the claim evidence sufficient to establish that the apparent owner has claimed the property from the holder or that the property was delivered by the holder to the administrator in error.

The administrator may determine that an affidavit submitted by a holder is evidence sufficient to establish that the holder shall be entitled to reimbursement or to recover property under this section.

A holder shall not be required to pay a fee or other charge for reimbursement or return of property under this section.

Not later than ninety (90) days after a claim is filed under subsection (1) or (3) of this section, the administrator shall allow or deny the claim and give the claimant notice of the decision in a record. If the administrator does not take action on a claim during the ninety (90) day period, the claim shall be deemed denied.

The claimant may initiate a proceeding under KRS Chapter 13B for review of the administrator’s decision or the deemed denial under subsection (7) of this section not later than:

Thirty (30) days following receipt of the notice of the administrator’s decision; or

One hundred twenty (120) days following the filing of a claim under subsection (1) or (3) of this section in the case of a deemed denial under subsection (7) of this section.

A final decision in an administrative proceeding initiated under subsection (8) of this section shall be subject to judicial review under KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 35, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.360.
Property removed from safe-deposit box.

Property removed from a safe-deposit box and delivered under this chapter to the administrator shall be subject to the holder’s right to reimbursement for the cost of opening the box and a lien or contract providing reimbursement to the holder for unpaid rent charges for the box. The administrator shall reimburse the holder from the proceeds remaining after deducting the expense incurred by the administrator in selling the property.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 36, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.370.
Administrator’s options as to custody.

The administrator may decline to take custody of property reported under KRS

393A.220

if the administrator determines that:

The property has a value less than the estimated expenses of notice and sale of the property; or

Taking custody of the property would be unlawful.

A holder may pay or deliver property to the administrator before the property shall be presumed abandoned under this chapter if the holder:

Sends the apparent owner of the property notice required by KRS

393A.270

and provides the administrator evidence of the holder’s compliance with this paragraph;

Includes with the payment or delivery a report regarding the property conforming to KRS

393A.230

; and

First obtains the administrator’s consent in a record to accept payment or delivery.

A holder’s request for the administrator’s consent under subsection (2)(c) of this section shall be in a record. If the administrator fails to respond to the request not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the request, the administrator shall be deemed to consent to the payment or delivery of the property and the payment or delivery shall be considered to have been made in good faith.

On payment or delivery of property under subsection (2) of this section, the property shall be presumed abandoned.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.380.
Disposition of property having no substantial value — Immunity from liability.

If the administrator takes custody of property delivered under this chapter and later determines that the property has no substantial commercial value or that the cost of disposing of the property will exceed the value of the property, the administrator may return the property to the holder or destroy or otherwise dispose of the property.

In disposing of property under subsection (1) of this section, the administrator may deliver the property to the Kentucky Historical Society, or any other museum, historical society, or organization approved by the administrator, and on such terms as the administrator deems appropriate. Upon delivery of the property to a third party described in this subsection, the administrator shall no longer be responsible for the safekeeping of the property.

An action or proceeding shall not be commenced against the state, an agency of the state, the administrator, another officer, employee, or agent of the state, or a holder for or because of an act of the administrator under this section, except for intentional misconduct or malfeasance.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 38, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.390.
Periods of limitation and repose.

Expiration, before, on, or after July 14, 2018, of a period of limitation on an owner’s right to receive or recover property, whether specified by contract, statute, or court order, shall not prevent the property from being presumed abandoned or affect the duty of a holder under this chapter to file a report or pay or deliver property to the administrator.

The administrator shall not commence an action or proceeding to enforce this chapter with respect to the reporting, payment, or delivery of property more than five (5) years after the holder filed a non-fraudulent report under KRS

393A.220

with the administrator. The parties may agree in a record to extend the limitation in this subsection.

The administrator shall not commence an action, proceeding, or examination with respect to a duty of a holder under this chapter more than ten (10) years after the duty arose.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 39, effective July 14, 2018.